en: Retsina of Peania, Retsina of Liopesi, Retsina of Liopesi Attika
el: Ρετσίνα Παιανίας Αττική, Ρετσίνα Λιοπεσίου Αττική, Ρετσίνα Παιανίας, Ρετσίνα Λιοπεσίου, Retsina of Peania, Retsina of Liopesi, Retsina of Liopesi Attika

en: Retsina of Pikermi, Retsina of Pikermi Attika
el: Ρετσίνα Πικερμίου, Ρετσίνα Πικερμίου Αττική, Retsina of Pikermi, Retsina of Pikermi Attika

en: Retsina of Spata, Retsina of Spata Attika
el: Ρετσίνα Σπάτων, Ρετσίνα Σπάτων Αττική, Retsina of Spata, Retsina of Spata Attika

en: Retsina of Thebes, Retsina of Thebes Viotia
el: Ρετσίνα Θηβών, Ρετσίνα Θηβών Βοιωτία, Retsina of Thebes, Retsina of Thebes Viotia

en: Retsina of Viotia
el: Ρετσίνα Βοιωτίας, Retsina of Viotia

en: Rhodes Muscatel
el: Rhodes Muscatel, Μοσχάτος Ρόδου

en: Ritsona
el: Ritsona, Ριτσώνα

en: Wines from Hungary, Hungarian Wines
de: Weine aus Ungarn
fr: Vins de Hongrie, vins hongrois
hr: Vina iz Mađarske
hu: Magyar borok, Borok magyarországról, Magyarországi borok
nl: Hongaarse wijnen, Hongaarse wijn, Wijn uit Hongarije

en: Wines from Italy, Italian wines
de: italienische Weine
es: Vinos de Italia
fi: italialaiset viinit
fr: Vins italiens, vin italien, vins d'Italie, vin d'Italie
hr: Vina iz italije
hu: Olasz borok, Olaszországi borok
it: Vini italiani
nl: Italiaanse wijnen, Italiaanse wijn, Wijn uit Italië

it: Bardolino
xx: Bardolino

en: Chianti
xx: Chianti

hr: Vino marsala
en: Marsala wine
fr: Marsala
it: Marsala

en: Marsala with eggs
fr: Marsala aux oeufs

it: Mitterberg tra Cauria e Tel
de: Mitterberg zwischen Gfrill und Toll

en: Prosecco
xx: Prosecco

en: Wines from Luxembourg
fr: Vins du Luxembourg, vins luxembourgeois
hr: Vina iz Luksemburga
hu: Luxembourgi borok
nl: Luxemburgse wijnen, Luxemburgse wijn, Wijn uit Luxemburg

en: Wines from Malta
fr: Vins de Malte, Vins maltais
hr: Vina s malte
hu: Máltai borok
nl: Maltese wijnen, Maltese wijn, Wijn uit Malta

en: Wines from Portugal, Portuguese wines
de: portugiesische Weine
es: Vinos de Portugal
fi: Portugalilaiset viinit, Viinit Portugalista
fr: Vins portugais, Vins du Portugal, Vin portugais, Vin du Portugal
hr: Vina iz portugala
hu: Portugál borok
nl: Portugese wijnen, Portugese wijn, Wijn uit Portugal
pt: Vinhos de Portugal

en: Madeira Wine
de: Madeira Wein
fr: Madère, Vin de Madère
hr: Vino madeira
hu: Madeirai borok
it: Vino di Madera
nl: Madeira Wijn
pt: Madeira, Vinho da Madeira

en: Romanian wines
hu: Romániai borok, Román borok